Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND 2 Section 1. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS ââ 3 ADMINISTRATION. There is appropriated from the general 4 fund of the state to the department for the blind for the 5 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 6 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 10 equivalent positions: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,236,726 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 88.98 13 DIVISION II 14 FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS ââ DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 15 Sec. 2. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated 16 from the general fund of the state to the department of 17 education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 18 ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof 19 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 20 1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION 21 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 22 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 23 equivalent positions: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,073,808 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 71.62 26 b. By January 15, 2026, the department shall submit 27 a written report to the general assembly detailing the 28 departmentâs antibullying programming and current and projected 29 expenditures for such programming for the fiscal year beginning 30 July 1, 2025. 31 2. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION ADMINISTRATION 32 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 33 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 34 equivalent positions: 35 -1- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 1/ 27 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 721,779 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 10.80 2 3. PUBLIC BROADCASTING DIVISION 3 For salaries, support, maintenance, capital expenditures, 4 and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following 5 full-time equivalent positions: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,214,440 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 57.11 8 4. CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION 9 For reimbursement for career and technical education 10 expenditures made by regional career and technical education 11 planning partnerships in accordance with section 256.136: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,952,459 13 5. SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE 14 For use as state matching moneys for federal programs that 15 shall be disbursed according to federal regulations, including 16 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and 17 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,176,797 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 26.42 20 6. BIRTH TO AGE THREE SERVICES 21 a. For expansion of the federal Individuals with 22 Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004, Pub. L. No. 23 108-446, as amended to January 1, 2018, birth through age three 24 services due to increased numbers of children qualifying for 25 those services: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,721,400 27 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, 28 $383,769 shall be allocated to the child health specialty 29 clinics administered by the state university of Iowa in order 30 to provide additional support for infants and toddlers who are 31 born prematurely, drug-exposed, or medically fragile. 32 7. EARLY HEAD START PROJECTS 33 a. For early head start projects: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 574,500 35 -2- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 2/ 27 H.F. _____ b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 1 used for implementation and expansion of early head start 2 pilot projects addressing the comprehensive cognitive, social, 3 emotional, and developmental needs of children from birth to 4 age three, including prenatal support for qualified families. 5 The projects shall promote healthy prenatal outcomes and 6 healthy family functioning, and strengthen the development of 7 infants and toddlers in low-income families. Priority shall be 8 given to those organizations that have previously qualified for 9 and received state funding to administer an early head start 10 project. 11 8. STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT AND TEACHER QUALITY PROGRAM 12 For purposes of the student achievement and teacher quality 13 program established pursuant to chapter 284 , and for not more 14 than the following full-time equivalent positions: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,990,467 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5.87 17 9. STATEWIDE STUDENT ASSESSMENT 18 a. For distribution to the Iowa testing program by the 19 department of education on behalf of school districts and 20 accredited nonpublic schools to offset the costs associated 21 with a statewide student assessment administered in accordance 22 with section 256.7, subsection 21 , paragraph âbâ: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 24 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more 25 than $300,000 shall be distributed to the Iowa testing programs 26 within the state university of Iowa college of education 27 to offset the costs of administering the statewide student 28 assessment at accredited nonpublic schools. 29 10. STATEWIDE CLEARINGHOUSE TO EXPAND WORK-BASED LEARNING 30 For support costs associated with the creation of a 31 statewide clearinghouse to expand work-based learning as a part 32 of the future ready Iowa initiative: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 34 11. POSTSECONDARY SUMMER CLASSES FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS 35 -3- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 3/ 27 H.F. _____ PROGRAM 1 For support costs associated with the creation of a program 2 to provide additional moneys for resident high school pupils 3 enrolled in grades 9 through 12 to attend a community college 4 for college-level classes or attend a class taught by a 5 community college-employed instructor during the summer and 6 outside of the regular school year through a contractual 7 agreement between a community college and a school district 8 under the future ready Iowa initiative: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 10 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 11 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 12 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 13 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 14 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 15 fiscal year. 16 12. JOBS FOR AMERICAâS GRADUATES 17 For school districts to reinforce collaborative efforts and 18 regional initiatives that accelerate work-based learning and 19 credential attainment, and to provide direct career education 20 services to identified middle school or high school students 21 enrolled in school districts through direct instruction by a 22 jobs for Americaâs graduates specialist: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,146,450 24 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys received by the 25 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 26 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 27 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 28 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 29 fiscal year. 30 13. ATTENDANCE CENTER PERFORMANCE/GENERAL INTERNET SITE AND 31 DATA SYSTEM SUPPORT 32 For administration of a process for school districts to 33 establish specific performance goals and to evaluate the 34 performance of each attendance center operated by the district 35 -4- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 4/ 27 H.F. _____ in order to arrive at an overall school performance grade and 1 report card for each attendance center, for internet site 2 and data system support, and for not more than the following 3 full-time equivalent positions: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.85 6 14. SUCCESSFUL PROGRESSION FOR EARLY READERS 7 For distribution to school districts for implementation 8 of section 279.68, subsection 2 , relating to successful 9 progression for early readers: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,824,782 11 15. EARLY WARNING SYSTEM FOR LITERACY 12 a. For purposes of purchasing a statewide license for an 13 early warning assessment and administering the early warning 14 system for literacy established in accordance with section 15 279.68 and rules adopted in accordance with section 256.7, 16 subsection 31 : 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,915,000 18 b. The department shall administer and distribute to school 19 districts and accredited nonpublic schools the early warning 20 assessment system that allows teachers to screen and monitor 21 student literacy skills from prekindergarten through grade 22 six. The department may charge school districts and accredited 23 nonpublic schools a fee for the system not to exceed the actual 24 costs to purchase a statewide license for the early warning 25 assessment minus the moneys received by the department under 26 this subsection. The fee shall be determined by dividing the 27 actual remaining costs to purchase the statewide license for 28 the school year by the number of pupils assessed under the 29 system in the current fiscal year. School districts may use 30 moneys received pursuant to section 257.10, subsection 11 , and 31 moneys received for purposes of implementing section 279.68, 32 subsection 2 , to pay the early warning assessment system fee. 33 16. IOWA READING RESEARCH CENTER 34 a. For purposes of the Iowa reading research center in 35 -5- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 5/ 27 H.F. _____ order to implement, in collaboration with the area education 1 agencies, the provisions of section 256.9, subsection 49 , 2 paragraph âcâ: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 4 b. From moneys appropriated in this subsection, not more 5 than $250,000 shall be used for collaborations with the state 6 board of education relating to the approval of practitioner 7 preparation programs pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 3 , 8 paragraph âcâ, and with the board of educational examiners for 9 the establishment and continuing oversight of the advanced 10 dyslexia specialist endorsement pursuant to section 256.146, 11 subsection 21. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 12 ending June 30, 2026, the center shall submit a report to the 13 general assembly detailing the expenditures of moneys used for 14 purposes of this paragraph âbâ. 15 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 16 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 17 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 18 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 19 specified in this subsection until the close of the succeeding 20 fiscal year. 21 17. COMPUTER SCIENCE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT INCENTIVE 22 FUND 23 For deposit in the computer science professional development 24 incentive fund established under section 284.6A : 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 26 18. CHILDRENâS MENTAL HEALTH SCHOOL-BASED TRAINING AND 27 SUPPORT 28 a. For distribution to area education agencies for 29 school-based childrenâs mental health services, including 30 mental health awareness training for educators: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,383,936 32 b. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection for 33 distribution to area education agencies, $200,000 shall be 34 used for purposes of implementing a childrenâs grief and loss 35 -6- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 6/ 27 H.F. _____ rural pilot program to serve Iowa children in rural school 1 districts or accredited nonpublic schools. The pilot program 2 shall be administered by, and the moneys allocated pursuant to 3 this paragraph shall be distributed to, an existing statewide 4 not-for-profit health care organization that currently provides 5 grief and loss services to children. For the fiscal year 6 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the health 7 care organization receiving moneys pursuant to this paragraph 8 shall prepare a report, in collaboration with the department 9 of education, detailing the expenditures of moneys used for 10 the purposes of this program and its outcomes, which shall be 11 submitted to the general assembly by September 30, 2026. 12 19. BEST BUDDIES IOWA 13 a. For school districts to create opportunities for 14 one-to-one friendships, integrated employment, and leadership 15 development for students with intellectual and developmental 16 disabilities: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 35,000 18 b. The department of education shall establish criteria for 19 the distribution of moneys appropriated under this subsection 20 and shall require an organization receiving moneys under this 21 subsection to annually report student identifying data for 22 students participating in the program to the department in the 23 manner prescribed by the department as a condition of receiving 24 such moneys. 25 20. MIDWESTERN HIGHER EDUCATION COMPACT 26 a. For distribution to the midwestern higher education 27 compact to pay Iowaâs member state annual obligation: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,000 29 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated 30 pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered or 31 unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 32 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 33 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 34 21. NONPUBLIC SCHOOL CONCURRENT ENROLLMENT PAYMENTS TO 35 -7- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 7/ 27 H.F. _____ COMMUNITY COLLEGES 1 For payments to community colleges for the concurrent 2 enrollment of accredited nonpublic school students under 3 section 261E.8, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 5 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys received by the 6 department pursuant to this subsection that remain unencumbered 7 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 8 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 9 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 10 22. COMMUNITY COLLEGES 11 For general state financial aid to merged areas, as defined 12 in section 260C.2 , in accordance with section 260C.18C: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $243,858,161 14 23. IOWA SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF 15 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 16 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 17 equivalent positions: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,941,398 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 120.00 20 24. IOWA EDUCATIONAL SERVICES FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY 21 IMPAIRED PROGRAM 22 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 23 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 24 equivalent positions: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,012,169 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 56.00 27 25. SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, AND MATHEMATICS 28 (STEM) COLLABORATIVE INITIATIVE 29 For purposes of the science, technology, engineering, 30 and mathematics (STEM) collaborative initiative established 31 pursuant to section 256.111, and for not more than the 32 following full-time equivalent positions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,354,848 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5.00 35 -8- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 8/ 27 H.F. _____ a. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the 1 moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be expended for 2 salaries, staffing, institutional support, activities directly 3 related to recruitment of kindergarten through grade 12 4 mathematics and science teachers, and for ongoing mathematics 5 and science programming for students enrolled in kindergarten 6 through grade 12. 7 b. The department shall work with the community colleges to 8 develop STEM professional development programs for community 9 college instructors and STEM curriculum development. 10 c. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not less 11 than $500,000 shall be used to provide technology education 12 opportunities to high school, career academy, and community 13 college students through a public-private partnership, as 14 well as opportunities for students and faculties at these 15 institutions to secure broad-based information technology 16 certification. The partnership shall provide all of the 17 following: 18 (1) A research-based curriculum. 19 (2) Online access to the curriculum. 20 (3) Instructional software for classroom and student use. 21 (4) Certification of skills and competencies in a broad base 22 of information technology-related skill areas. 23 (5) Professional development for teachers. 24 (6) Deployment and program support, including but not 25 limited to integration with current curriculum standards. 26 d. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , of the moneys appropriated 27 in this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 28 the close of the fiscal year, an amount equivalent to not more 29 than 5 percent of the amount appropriated in this subsection 30 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 31 summer programs for students until the close of the succeeding 32 fiscal year. 33 26. THERAPEUTIC CLASSROOM INCENTIVE FUND 34 For deposit in the therapeutic classroom incentive fund 35 -9- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 9/ 27 H.F. _____ established pursuant to section 256.25 : 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,351,382 2 27. ONLINE STATE JOB POSTING SYSTEM 3 For purposes of administering an online state job posting 4 system that allows the department of education, school 5 districts, charter schools, area education agencies, and 6 accredited nonpublic schools to post job openings on an 7 internet site: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 265,000 9 28. LEAD-K PROGRAM 10 For purposes of developing guidelines for a comprehensive 11 family support mentoring program that meets the language and 12 communication needs of families pursuant to section 256.106: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 14 29. DIVISION OF SPECIAL EDUCATION 15 For general supervision, oversight, compliance, employee 16 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes 17 within the area education agency regions and the department 18 of education main office, and for not more than the following 19 full-time equivalent positions: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 60.00 22 30. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT 23 For purposes of providing required professional development 24 to public and nonpublic schools: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,176,458 26 31. COLLEGE STUDENT AID COMMISSION 27 a. Administration 28 For general administration salaries, support, maintenance, 29 and miscellaneous purposes, and for the administration of the 30 future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship 31 program in accordance with section 256.228, including salaries, 32 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes related to the 33 future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar scholarship 34 program, and for not more than the following full-time 35 -10- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 10/ 27 H.F. _____ equivalent positions: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 591,533 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.95 3 b. National guard service scholarship program 4 For purposes of providing national guard service 5 scholarships under the program established in section 256.210: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,600,000 7 c. All Iowa opportunity scholarship program 8 (1) For purposes of the all Iowa opportunity scholarship 9 program established pursuant to section 256.212: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,229,468 11 (2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, if the 12 moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph exceed $500,000, 13 âeligible institutionâ as defined in section 256.212 shall, 14 during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, include 15 accredited private institutions as defined in section 256.183. 16 d. Teach Iowa scholar program 17 For purposes of the teach Iowa scholar program established 18 pursuant to section 256.218: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 650,000 20 e. Rural veterinarian loan repayment program 21 For purposes of the rural veterinarian loan repayment 22 program established pursuant to section 256.226: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 24 f. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce last-dollar 25 scholarship program 26 For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce 27 last-dollar scholarship fund established pursuant to section 28 256.228: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,927,005 30 g. Future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant program 31 For deposit in the future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant 32 fund established pursuant to section 256.229: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 34 h. Iowa workforce grant and incentive program 35 -11- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 11/ 27 H.F. _____ For deposit in the Iowa workforce grant and incentive 1 program fund created in section 256.230: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,500,000 3 i. Health care professional incentive program 4 For deposit in the health care professional incentive 5 program fund created in section 256.222, if enacted in 2025 6 Iowa Acts, Senate File 618, 2025 Iowa Acts, House File 972, or 7 any successor legislation: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,002,350 9 Sec. 3. IOWA SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND 10 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled 11 worker and job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the 12 department of education for the fiscal year beginning July 13 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 14 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 15 designated: 16 1. For purposes of providing skilled workforce shortage 17 tuition grants in accordance with section 256.227: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 19 2. For deposit in the workforce training and economic 20 development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,100,000 22 From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, not 23 more than $100,000 shall be used by the department for 24 administration of the workforce training and economic 25 development funds created pursuant to section 260C.18A . 26 3. For capital projects at community colleges that meet the 27 definition of the term âvertical infrastructureâ in section 28 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,000,000 30 Moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be disbursed 31 pursuant to section 260G.6, subsection 3 . Projects that 32 qualify for moneys appropriated in this subsection must include 33 at least one of the following: 34 a. Accelerated career education program capital projects. 35 -12- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 12/ 27 H.F. _____ b. Major renovations and major repair needs, including 1 health, life, and fire safety needs, including compliance with 2 the federal Americans with Disabilities Act. 3 4. For deposit in the pathways for academic career and 4 employment fund established pursuant to section 260H.2 : 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 6 5. For deposit in the gap tuition assistance fund 7 established pursuant to section 260I.2 : 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 9 6. For support costs associated with administering a 10 workforce preparation outcome reporting system for the purpose 11 of collecting and reporting data relating to the educational 12 and employment outcomes of workforce preparation programs 13 receiving moneys pursuant to this section: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 15 7. For STEM best: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 17 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 18 section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 19 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 20 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 21 succeeding fiscal year. 22 Sec. 4. CHIROPRACTIC LOAN FUNDS. Notwithstanding section 23 256.204, the moneys deposited in the chiropractic loan 24 revolving fund created pursuant to section 256.204 for the 25 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 26 may be used for purposes of the chiropractic loan forgiveness 27 program established in section 256.205. 28 Sec. 5. PRESCRIPTION DRUG COSTS. The department of 29 administrative services shall pay the Iowa school for the deaf 30 and the Iowa educational services for the blind and visually 31 impaired program the moneys collected from the counties during 32 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, for expenses relating 33 to prescription drug costs for students attending the Iowa 34 school for the deaf and the Iowa educational services for the 35 -13- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 13/ 27 H.F. _____ blind and visually impaired program. 1 DIVISION III 2 FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS ââ STATE BOARD OF REGENTS 3 Sec. 6. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated 4 from the general fund of the state to the state board of 5 regents for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 6 June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 7 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 8 1. OFFICE OF STATE BOARD OF REGENTS 9 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 11 equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 764,642 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.48 14 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 15 30, 2026, the state board of regents shall submit a quarterly 16 financial report to the general assembly in a format agreed 17 upon by the state board of regents office and the legislative 18 services agency. The report submitted for the quarter ending 19 December 31, 2025, shall include the five-year graduation rates 20 for the regents universities. 21 b. For distribution to the western Iowa regents resource 22 center: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 268,297 24 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 25 June 30, 2026, the state board of regents and the institutions 26 of higher learning governed by the state board of regents 27 shall not reduce moneys budgeted for the fiscal year for the 28 institutionsâ police departments. 29 d. For allocation in equal parts by the state board of 30 regents to the state university of Iowa, the Iowa state 31 university of science and technology, and the university 32 of northern Iowa to support the John Pappajohn centers for 33 entrepreneurship: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 35 -14- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 14/ 27 H.F. _____ The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph shall be 1 used to supplement, not supplant, any other funding received by 2 the John Pappajohn centers for entrepreneurship. 3 2. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 4 a. General university 5 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 6 aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the 7 following full-time equivalent positions: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $222,628,136 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 5,058.55 10 b. Oakdale campus 11 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 12 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 13 equivalent positions: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,103,819 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 38.25 16 c. State hygienic laboratory 17 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 18 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 19 equivalent positions: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,822,610 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 102.50 22 d. Family practice program 23 For allocation by the dean of the college of medicine, with 24 approval of the advisory board, to qualified participants 25 to carry out the provisions of chapter 148D for the family 26 practice residency education program, including salaries 27 and support, and for not more than the following full-time 28 equivalent positions: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,220,598 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.71 31 e. Child health care services 32 For specialized child health care services, including 33 childhood cancer diagnostic and treatment network programs, 34 rural comprehensive care for hemophilia patients, and the 35 -15- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 15/ 27 H.F. _____ Iowa high-risk infant follow-up program, including salaries 1 and support, and for not more than the following full-time 2 equivalent positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 634,502 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.16 5 f. Statewide cancer registry 6 For the statewide cancer registry, and for not more than the 7 following full-time equivalent positions: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 143,410 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.10 10 g. Substance abuse consortium 11 For distribution to the Iowa consortium for substance abuse 12 research and evaluation, and for not more than the following 13 full-time equivalent positions: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 53,427 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .99 16 h. Center for biocatalysis 17 For the center for biocatalysis, and for not more than the 18 following full-time equivalent positions: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 696,342 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 6.28 21 i. Primary health care initiative 22 For the primary health care initiative in the college 23 of medicine, and for not more than the following full-time 24 equivalent positions: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 624,374 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 6.22 27 From the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, 28 $254,889 shall be allocated to the department of family 29 practice at the state university of Iowa college of medicine 30 for family practice faculty and support staff. 31 j. Birth defects registry 32 For the birth defects registry, and for not more than the 33 following full-time equivalent positions: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 36,839 35 -16- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 16/ 27 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .38 1 k. Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center 2 For the Larned A. Waterman Iowa nonprofit resource center, 3 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 4 positions: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 156,389 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.75 7 l. Iowa online advanced placement academy science, 8 technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative 9 For the Iowa online advanced placement academy science, 10 technology, engineering, and mathematics initiative established 11 pursuant to section 263.8A : 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 463,616 13 m. Iowa flood center 14 For the Iowa flood center for use by the universityâs college 15 of engineering pursuant to section 466C.1 : 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,205,593 17 n. College of nursing 18 For employing additional instructors in the college of 19 nursing to increase the number of students who graduate from 20 the college of nursing: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,800,000 22 o. Iowa cancer assessment and intervention plan 23 For purposes of developing an Iowa cancer assessment and 24 intervention plan, under the direction of and on behalf of 25 the department of health and human services, pursuant to 26 an agreement between the state university of Iowa and the 27 department of health and human services: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 29 The Iowa cancer assessment and intervention plan must 30 include a thorough analysis of the potential causes of Iowaâs 31 high incidence of cancer in order to guide the department of 32 health and human services in developing targeted policies, 33 enhancing prevention and screening programs, raising public 34 awareness, and integrating evidence-based findings into 35 -17- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 17/ 27 H.F. _____ existing initiatives. The state university of Iowaâs 1 expenditure of moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 2 is contingent upon the state university of Iowa complying with 3 the terms, conditions, and prescribed deliverables in the 4 agreement between the university and the department of health 5 and human services. 6 p. Center for intellectual freedom 7 For purposes of the center for intellectual freedom 8 established pursuant to section 263C.2, if enacted by 2025 Iowa 9 Acts, House File 437: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 11 q. Mental health and maternal primary care health programs 12 For purposes of increasing the number of providers of 13 mental health care services in rural areas in this state, 14 including by developing the health care workforce pipeline 15 and recruiting and retaining high-quality faculty and staff, 16 increasing the number of providers of maternal health care 17 services in rural areas in this state and facilitating the safe 18 and efficient transportation of pregnant women and newborns 19 to medical facilities, and providing simulation training to 20 address maternal health care complications in rural areas in 21 this state: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,000,000 23 3. IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY 24 a. General university 25 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 26 aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the 27 following full-time equivalent positions: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $177,656,037 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 3,647.42 30 b. Agricultural experiment station 31 For the agricultural experiment station salaries, support, 32 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than 33 the following full-time equivalent positions: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 31,462,535 35 -18- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 18/ 27 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 190.63 1 c. Cooperative extension service in agriculture and home 2 economics 3 For the cooperative extension service in agriculture 4 and home economics salaries, support, maintenance, and 5 miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following 6 full-time equivalent positions: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 19,157,366 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 240.41 9 d. Preparing Iowaâs future ready workforce and fostering 10 innovation 11 For purposes of addressing the stateâs workforce needs in 12 the areas of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics 13 by expanding degree and certificate programs in the areas of 14 artificial intelligence, cybersecurity, computer science, 15 computer engineering, data science, software engineering, and 16 other high-demand areas related to technology, and fostering 17 innovation in the areas of digital agriculture, manufacturing, 18 water quality, vaccine delivery technologies, and biosciences: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,800,000 20 e. Veterinary early acceptance 21 For purposes of the veterinary early acceptance program: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 23 4. UNIVERSITY OF NORTHERN IOWA 24 a. General university 25 For salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, financial 26 aid, and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the 27 following full-time equivalent positions: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $101,408,002 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1,250.28 30 b. Real estate education program 31 For purposes of the real estate education program, and for 32 not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 123,523 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs .86 35 -19- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 19/ 27 H.F. _____ c. Educators for Iowa 1 For purposes of recruiting additional students to 2 participate in educational opportunities that lead to teacher 3 licensure: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 5 d. Center for civic education 6 For purposes of establishing and operating a center for 7 civic education that promotes the values of free speech, 8 civic leadership, public service, and citizenship, and 9 that enhances civic education among students enrolled in 10 colleges and universities in this state, students enrolled 11 in prekindergarten through grade twelve in schools in this 12 state, teachers, and the public by developing and implementing 13 effective civic learning strategies, encouraging respectful 14 dialogue, and offering educational resources related to free 15 speech and civic knowledge: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 17 e. In-state tuition for students who reside in contiguous 18 states 19 For purposes of classifying students who reside in 20 contiguous states and who will enroll in the undergraduate 21 program offered by the university of northern Iowa as residents 22 of this state for purposes of undergraduate tuition and 23 mandatory fees: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 25 Sec. 7. ENERGY COST-SAVINGS PROJECTS ââ FINANCING. For 26 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 27 2026, the state board of regents may use notes, bonds, or 28 other evidences of indebtedness issued under section 262.48 to 29 finance projects that will result in energy cost savings in an 30 amount that will cause the state board to recover the cost of 31 the projects within an average of six years. 32 DIVISION IV 33 STANDING APPROPRIATIONS 34 Sec. 8. AT-RISK CHILDREN. Notwithstanding the standing 35 -20- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 20/ 27 H.F. _____ appropriation in section 279.51 for the fiscal year beginning 1 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated 2 from the general fund of the state to the department of 3 education for programs for at-risk children under section 4 279.51 shall not be more than $10,524,389. The amount of any 5 reduction in this section shall be prorated among the programs 6 specified in section 279.51, subsection 1, paragraphs âaâ, âbâ, 7 and âcâ. 8 Sec. 9. WORK-STUDY APPROPRIATION. Notwithstanding section 9 256.209, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 10 ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated from the general 11 fund of the state to the college student aid commission of 12 the department of education for the work-study program under 13 section 256.209 shall be zero. 14 Sec. 10. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. The following takes 15 effect July 1, 2025, if the portion of 2025 Iowa Acts, Senate 16 File 445, or any successor legislation, that reduces the 17 standing appropriation in section 279.51, subsection 1, is not 18 enacted: 19 The section of this division of this Act relating to the 20 standing appropriation in section 279.51, subsection 1. 21 DIVISION V 22 STATE PROGRAM ALLOCATION 23 Sec. 11. Section 284.13, subsection 1, paragraphs a, b, c, 24 e, f, and g, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 25 a. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and 26 ending June 30, 2025 2026 , to the department, the amount of 27 five hundred eight thousand two hundred fifty dollars for the 28 issuance of national board certification awards in accordance 29 with section 256.44 . Of the amount allocated under this 30 paragraph, not less than eighty-five thousand dollars shall 31 be used to administer the ambassador to education position in 32 accordance with section 256.45 . 33 b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and 34 ending June 30, 2025 2026 , up to seven hundred twenty-eight 35 -21- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 21/ 27 H.F. _____ thousand two hundred sixteen dollars to the department for 1 purposes of implementing the professional development program 2 requirements of section 284.6 , assistance in developing model 3 evidence for teacher quality committees established pursuant to 4 section 284.4, subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ , and the evaluator 5 training program in section 284.10 . A portion of the funds 6 allocated to the department for purposes of this paragraph may 7 be used by the department for administrative purposes and for 8 not more than four full-time equivalent positions. 9 c. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , 10 and ending June 30, 2025 2026 , an amount up to one million 11 seventy-seven thousand eight hundred ten dollars to the 12 department for the establishment of teacher development 13 academies in accordance with section 284.6, subsection 10 . A 14 portion of the funds allocated to the department for purposes 15 of this paragraph may be used for administrative purposes. 16 e. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and 17 ending June 30, 2025 2026 , to the department an amount up to 18 fifty thousand dollars for purposes of the fine arts beginning 19 teacher mentoring program established under section 256.34 . 20 f. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024 2025 , and 21 ending June 30, 2025 2026 , to the department an amount up 22 to six hundred twenty-six thousand one hundred ninety-one 23 dollars shall be used by the department for a delivery system, 24 in collaboration with area education agencies, to assist in 25 implementing the career paths and leadership roles considered 26 pursuant to sections 284.15 , 284.16 , and 284.17 , including but 27 not limited to planning grants to school districts and area 28 education agencies, technical assistance for the department, 29 technical assistance for districts and area education agencies, 30 training and staff development, and the contracting of external 31 expertise and services. In using moneys allocated for purposes 32 of this paragraph, the department shall give priority to school 33 districts with certified enrollments of fewer than six hundred 34 students. A portion of the moneys allocated annually to the 35 -22- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 22/ 27 H.F. _____ department for purposes of this paragraph may be used by the 1 department for administrative purposes and for not more than 2 five full-time equivalent positions. 3 g. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and 4 for each subsequent fiscal year, to the department, ten 5 million dollars for purposes of implementing the supplemental 6 assistance for high-need schools provisions of section 284.11 . 7 Annually, of the moneys allocated to the department for 8 purposes of this paragraph, up to one hundred thousand dollars 9 may be used by the department for administrative purposes and 10 for not more than one full-time equivalent position. 11 DIVISION VI 12 COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM 13 Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION ââ COURT REPORTER 14 EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the 15 general fund of the state to the department of education for 16 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 17 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 18 to be used for the purposes designated: 19 For deposit in the court reporter equipment grant program 20 fund created in section 256.231, as enacted by this division 21 of this Act: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 50,000 23 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 256.231 Court reporter equipment 24 grant program. 25 1. A court reporter equipment grant program is established 26 to be administered by the college student aid commission. A 27 person is eligible to apply for a grant award under the program 28 if the person is enrolled in a court reporter training program 29 in this state. 30 2. Each applicant for the court reporter equipment grant 31 program shall, in accordance with the rules of the commission, 32 complete and file an application for a grant award. The 33 individual shall be responsible for the prompt submission of 34 any information required by the commission. 35 -23- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 23/ 27 H.F. _____ 3. A recipient of a grant under the court reporter equipment 1 grant program must use the moneys awarded by the college 2 student aid commission for the purchase of court reporter 3 equipment and software for the court reporter training program 4 in which the recipient is participating. 5 4. The college student aid commission shall do all of the 6 following: 7 a. Establish the evaluation criteria to be used in 8 evaluating applications submitted under this section. The 9 college student aid commission shall give priority to 10 applicants who are doing court-related work. 11 b. Establish grant application materials, eligibility 12 requirements, award criteria, and award amounts. 13 5. A court reporter equipment grant program fund is created 14 in the state treasury under the control of the college student 15 aid commission. All moneys deposited or paid into the fund 16 are appropriated to the college student aid commission to 17 be used for grants awarded as provided under this section. 18 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund that remain 19 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall 20 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 21 purposes designated. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 22 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 23 to the fund. 24 6. The college student aid commission shall adopt rules 25 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. 26 Sec. 14. REPEAL. Sections 15.485 and 15.486, Code 2025, 27 are repealed. 28 Sec. 15. COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT INCENTIVE FUND 29 ââ TRANSFER TO COURT REPORTER EQUIPMENT GRANT PROGRAM 30 FUND. Unencumbered and unobligated moneys remaining in the 31 court reporter equipment incentive fund established pursuant 32 to section 15.486, Code 2025, on the effective date of this 33 division of this Act, are transferred to the court reporter 34 equipment grant program fund created in section 256.231, as 35 -24- LSB 1003YC (9) 91 jda/jh 24/ 27 H.F. _____ enacted by this division of this Act. 1 Sec. 16. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall 2 designate section 256.231, as enacted by this division of this 3 Act, as a new subpart within chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 4 4, entitled âcourt reporter equipment grant programâ. 5